Hawaii statutes.
§482-29 Classification. The
director to the extent practical shall establish a classification of goods and
services corresponding to the classification adopted by the United States
Patent and Trademark Office for convenience of administration of this part, but
not to limit or extend the applicant's or registrant's rights, and a single
application for registration of a mark shall be submitted for each appropriate
class and such goods upon which or each service with which the mark is actually
being used, together with the application fee. [L 2001, c 15, pt of §1; am L
2003, c 124, §98]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next